Washington statutes.
RCW 42.20.020

Powers may not be delegated for profit.

Every public officer who, for any reward, consideration, or gratuity paid or agreed to be paid, shall, directly or indirectly, grant to another the right or authority to discharge any function of his or her office, or permit another to perform any of his or her duties, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2012 c 117 s 113; 1909 c 249 s 83; RRS s 2335.]